test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-skuul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - škuuʹl a-stem koulu: # Noun - full paradigm
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [škooula, škõõula]
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: škuuʹlest
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: škuuʹlin
     škuuʹl+N+Ess+Indef: škuuʹlen
     škuuʹl+N+Par+Indef: škuuʹled
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [škuuʹltaa, škuuʹltää]
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: škuuʹli
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: škuuʹlid
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: škuuʹlid
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: škuuʹlin
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: škuuʹlivuiʹm
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [škuuʹlitaa, škuuʹlitää]
